Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3701
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-3701 to 76-3717 shall be known and may be cited as the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act.

Laws 2024, LB1301, § 4.